Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5245
New business premium rate, defined.

New business premium rate shall mean, for each class of business as to a rating period, the lowest premium rate charged or offered or which could have been charged or offered by the small employer carrier to small employers with similar case characteristics for newly issued health benefit plans with the same or similar coverage.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 23.